Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1416
Conflicting laws; adoption; which law controls.

If two or more conflicting laws are approved by the registered voters at the same election, the law receiving the greatest number of affirmative votes shall be paramount in all particulars as to which there is a conflict even though such law may not have received the greater majority of affirmative votes. If two or more conflicting amendments to the Constitution of Nebraska are approved by the registered voters at the same election, the amendment which receives the greatest number of affirmative votes shall be paramount in all particulars as to which there is conflict even though such amendment may not have received the greater majority of affirmative votes.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 398.